Missouri, session 2026, HB3234.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 473.398, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 473.398, to read as follows:
473.398. 1. Upon the death of a person, who has been a participant of aid, assistance,
care, services, or who has had moneys expended on his or her behalf by the department of
health and senior services, department of social services, or the department of mental health,
or by a county commission, the total amount paid to the decedent or expended upon his or
her behalf after January 1, 1978, shall be a debt due the state or county, as the case may be,
from the estate of the decedent. The debt shall be collected as provided by the probate code
of Missouri, chapters 472, 473, 474 and 475.
2. Procedures for the allowance of such claims shall be in accordance with this
chapter, and such claims shall be allowed as a claim of either the sixth or eighth class under
subdivisions (6) and (8) of section 473.397.
3. Such claim shall not be filed or allowed if it is determined that:
(1) The cost of collection will exceed the amount of the claim;
(2) The collection of the claim will adversely affect the need of the surviving spouse
or dependents of the decedent to reasonable care and support from the estate.
4. Claims consisting of moneys paid on the behalf of a participant as defined in 42
U.S.C. Section 1396 shall be allowed, except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, upon
the showing by the claimant of proof of moneys expended. Such proof may include but is not
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3234 2
limited to computerized records maintained by any governmental entity as described in
subsection 1 of this section of a request for payment for services rendered to the participant,
which shall be deemed to be competent and substantial evidence of payment.
5. The department of social services shall file a claim allowed under this section
against the estate of a decedent to recover a debt due to the department within six
months of receiving written or email notice of the issuance of letters testamentary or of
administration of the estate.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any claims, adjustments or
recoveries specifically prohibited by federal statutes or regulations duly promulgated
thereunder. Further, the federal government shall receive from the amount recovered any
portion to which it is entitled.
[6.] 7. Before any probate estate may be closed under this chapter, with respect to a
decedent who, at the time of death, was enrolled in MO HealthNet, the personal
representative of the estate shall file with the clerk of the court exercising probate
jurisdiction a release from the MO HealthNet division evidencing payment of all MO
HealthNet benefits, premiums, or other such costs due from the estate under law, unless
waived by the MO HealthNet division.
✔